Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.854

Powers and duties of organized crime intelligence unit.

The organized crime intelligence unit shall collect, evaluate, collate, and analyze data and specific investigative information concerning the existence, structure, activities and operations of organized crime and the participants involved therein; coordinate such intelligence data into a centralized system of intelligence information; furnish and exchange pertinent intelligence data with law enforcement agencies and prosecutors with such security and confidentiality as the chief of the Washington state patrol may determine; develop intelligence data concerning the infiltration of organized crime into legitimate businesses within the state of Washington and furnish pertinent intelligence information thereon to law enforcement agencies and prosecutors in affected jurisdictions; and may assist law enforcement agencies and prosecutors in developing evidence for purposes of criminal prosecution of organized crime activities upon request.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 202 s 3.]